Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.71.051 and 2020 c 325 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Applicants for licensure to practice medicine who have graduated from a school of medicine located outside of the states, territories, and possessions of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Dominion of Canada, shall file an application for licensure with the commission on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the commission. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:(a) That he or she has completed in a school of medicine a resident course of professional instruction equivalent to that required in this chapter for applicants generally;(b)(((i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, that))That he or she meets all the requirements which must be met by graduates of the United States and Canadian school of medicine except that he or she need not have graduated from a school of medicine approved by the commission;(((ii) An applicant for licensure under this section is not required to meet the requirements of RCW 18.71.050(1)(b) if he or she furnishes proof satisfactory to the commission that he or she has:(A)(I) Been admitted as a permanent immigrant to the United States as a person of exceptional ability in sciences pursuant to the rules of the United States department of labor; or(II) Been issued a permanent immigration visa; and(B) Received multiple sclerosis certified specialist status from the consortium of multiple sclerosis centers; and(C) Successfully completed at least twenty-four months of training in multiple sclerosis at an educational institution in the United States with an accredited residency program in neurology or rehabilitation;))(c) That he or she has satisfactorily passed the examination given by the educational ((council))commission for foreign medical graduates or has met the requirements in lieu thereof as set forth in rules adopted by the commission;(d) That he or she has the ability to read, write, speak, understand, and be understood in the English language.(2) An applicant may obtain an exceptional qualification waiver, waiving requirements determined by the commission in rule, if they possess an acceptable body of work related to research, medical excellence, or employment, and have the recommendation of other national or international experts in the same specialty or field.(3) The commission may adopt rules to establish a primary care license for applicants who have successfully completed the clinical experience graduate pilot program as outlined in section 2 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:(1) The commission shall establish and administer the clinical experience graduate pilot program.(2) The pilot program must allow an international medical graduate to participate in the program if the applicant:(a) Holds a clinical experience license issued on or before July 1, 2026;(b) Has completed two years of continuous supervised clinical practice under a clinical experience license;(c) Does not have any active disciplinary action or significant disciplinary history as determined by the commission;(d) Has obtained satisfactory clinical assessment evaluations from the supervising physician in all categories in a clinical assessment evaluation approved by the commission for the period of supervised practice;(e) Has obtained an attestation from the supervising physician; and(f) Has obtained a written endorsement from the medical director of the practice site if different than the supervising physician.(3) The Washington medical commission shall engage with the American board of medical specialties to consider a process for board certification for program participants.(4) The pilot program shall create a pathway to full, unrestricted medical licensure to provide primary care upon successful completion of the following:(a) Two years of supervised clinical experience license practice in addition to the two years of continuous supervised clinical practice under a clinical experience license needed to qualify for the pilot program;(b) Requirements of the clinical experience license program;(c) Step 3 of the United States medical licensing examination; and(d) Passing a clinical competency assessment approved by the commission.(5) Practice sites eligible for the program include:(a) Hospitals;(b) Federally qualified health centers;(c) Government entities;(d) Private practices or physician employment groups with at least 10 full-time equivalent, board-certified physicians that deliver in-person patient care in Washington state; and(e) Mental and behavioral health facilities, upon approval by the commission.(6) By November 1, 2027, and until November 1, 2035, the commission must provide an annual report on the clinical experience graduate pilot program to the legislature. The report must include:(a) Data about practice patterns of program participants, including, but not limited to, practice locations and specialty;(b) Relevant disciplinary actions taken against pilot program participants; and(c) Recommendations for how the pilot program could be expanded to include graduates of medical schools in the United States.(7) This section expires June 30, 2035.--- END ---